Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-8,195
Applications for licensure; statements;
fee.

Applications for licensure shall be on forms
prescribed and furnished by the board and
shall contain statements made under oath showing
the applicant's education and a detailed summary of his or her technical work.
Applications for licensure shall be accompanied
by an application fee in an amount determined by the board.

Laws 1967, c. 565, § 12, p. 1863;

Laws 1984, LB 477, § 6;

Laws 2012, LB1140, § 11.